test/src/morphology/A-parembi_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Adjective, comparative form - parembi: # Attribute ' / parembi' - full paradigm
     parembi+A+Sg+Nom: parembi
     parembi+A+Sg+Gen: paremban
     parembi+A+Sg+Acc: [parembi, paremban]
     parembi+A+Sg+Par: parembua
     parembi+A+Sg+Tra: parembakse
     parembi+A+Sg+Abe: [parembatta, parembata, parembattah]
     parembi+A+Sg+Com: parembanke
     parembi+A+Sg+Ine: parembas
     parembi+A+Sg+Ela: [parembaspäi, parembas]
     parembi+A+Sg+Ill: parembah
     parembi+A+Sg+Ade: parembal
     parembi+A+Sg+Abl: [parembalpäi, parembal]
     parembi+A+Sg+All: parembale
     parembi+A+Sg+Ess: parembannu
     parembi+A+Sg+Ter: parembassah
     parembi+A+Sg+Apr: paremballuo
     parembi+A+Pl+Nom: parembat
     parembi+A+Pl+Gen: parembien
     parembi+A+Pl+Acc: parembat
     parembi+A+Pl+Par: parembii
     parembi+A+Pl+Tra: parembikse
     parembi+A+Pl+Abe: [parembitta, parembita, parembittah]
     parembi+A+Pl+Com: parembienke
     parembi+A+Pl+Ine: parembis
     parembi+A+Pl+Ela: [parembispäi, parembis]
     parembi+A+Pl+Ill: parembih
     parembi+A+Pl+Ade: parembil
     parembi+A+Pl+Abl: [parembilpäi, parembil]
     parembi+A+Pl+All: parembile
     parembi+A+Pl+Ess: parembinnu
     parembi+A+Pl+Ins: parembin
     parembi+A+Pl+Apr: parembielluo
     parembi+A+Sg+Nom+Clt/gi: parembatgi
     parembi+A+Sg+Gen+Clt/gi: parembangi
     parembi+A+Sg+Acc+Clt/gi: [parembigi, parembangi]
     parembi+A+Sg+Par+Clt/gi: parembuagi
     parembi+A+Sg+Tra+Clt/gi: parembaksegi
     parembi+A+Sg+Abe+Clt/gi: [parembattagi, parembatagi, parembattahgi]
     parembi+A+Sg+Com+Clt/gi: parembankegi
     parembi+A+Sg+Ine+Clt/gi: parembasgi
     parembi+A+Sg+Ela+Clt/gi: [parembaspäigi, parembasgi]
     parembi+A+Sg+Ill+Clt/gi: parembahgi
     parembi+A+Sg+Ade+Clt/gi: parembalgi
     parembi+A+Sg+Abl+Clt/gi: [parembalpäigi, parembalgi]
     parembi+A+Sg+All+Clt/gi: parembalegi
     parembi+A+Sg+Ess+Clt/gi: parembannugi
     parembi+A+Sg+Ter+Clt/gi: parembassahgi
     parembi+A+Sg+Apr+Clt/gi: paremballuogi
     parembi+A+Pl+Nom+Clt/gi: parembatgi
     parembi+A+Pl+Gen+Clt/gi: parembiengi
     parembi+A+Pl+Acc+Clt/gi: parembatgi
     parembi+A+Pl+Par+Clt/gi: parembiigi
     parembi+A+Pl+Tra+Clt/gi: parembiksegi
     parembi+A+Pl+Abe+Clt/gi: [parembittagi, parembitagi, parembittahgi]
     parembi+A+Pl+Com+Clt/gi: parembienkegi
     parembi+A+Pl+Ine+Clt/gi: parembisgi
     parembi+A+Pl+Ela+Clt/gi: [parembispäigi, parembisgi]
     parembi+A+Pl+Ill+Clt/gi: parembihgi
     parembi+A+Pl+Ade+Clt/gi: parembilgi
     parembi+A+Pl+Abl+Clt/gi: [parembilpäigi, parembilgi]
     parembi+A+Pl+All+Clt/gi: parembilegi
     parembi+A+Pl+Ess+Clt/gi: parembinnugi
     parembi+A+Pl+Ins+Clt/gi: parembingi
     parembi+A+Pl+Apr+Clt/gi: parembielluogi
